src/esu.lexc
!-----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|----------------|

wang[PerPro]-[1Sg]-%:~(ng)u[N→V]:wang+'+u    VerbPostbase;
!wang[PerPro]-[1Pl]-%:~(ng)u[N→V]:          VerbPostbase;
!wang[PerPro]-[1Du]-%:~(ng)u[N→V]:          VerbPostbase;
ell[PerPro]-[2Sg]-%:~(ng)u[N→V]:el+pe+ngu    VerbPostbase;
!ell[PerPro]-[2Pl]-%:~(ng)u[N→V]:           VerbPostbase;
!ell[PerPro]-[2Du]-%:~(ng)u[N→V]:           VerbPostbase;
ell[PerPro]-[3Sg]-%:~(ng)u[N→V]:ell+ii+ngu   VerbPostbase;
!ell[PerPro]-[3Pl]-%:~(ng)u[N→V]:           VerbPostbase;
!ell[PerPro]-[3Du]-%:~(ng)u[N→V]:           VerbPostbase;
!ell[PerPro]-[4Sg]-%:~(ng)u[N→V]:           VerbPostbase;
!ell[PerPro]-[4Pl]-%:~(ng)u[N→V]:           VerbPostbase;
!ell[PerPro]-[4Du]-%:~(ng)u[N→V]:           VerbPostbase;

wang[PerPro]-[1Sg]-–r(ur)lur*[N→N]-[N][Abs][SgUnpd]:wi+i+u͡rlur*       EncliticOrEnd;
wang[PerPro]-[1Du]-–r(ur)lur*[N→N]-[N][Abs][DuUnpd]:wang+ku+rlu+uk    EncliticOrEnd;
wang[PerPro]-[1Pl]-–r(ur)lur*[N→N]-[N][Abs][PlUnpd]:wang+ku+rlu+ut    EncliticOrEnd;
ell[PerPro]-[2Sg]-–r(ur)lur*[N→N]-[N][Abs][SgUnpd]:el+pe+u͡rlur*       EncliticOrEnd;
ell[PerPro]-[2Sg]-–r(ur)lur*[N→N]-[N][Abs][SgUnpd]:el+pe+'u͡rlur*      EncliticOrEnd;
ell[PerPro]-[2Du]-–r(ur)lur*[N→N]-[N][Abs][DuUnpd]:el+pe+u͡rlur+petek  EncliticOrEnd;
ell[PerPro]-[2Du]-–r(ur)lur*[N→N]-[N][Abs][DuUnpd]:el+pe+'u͡rlur+petek EncliticOrEnd;
ell[PerPro]-[2Pl]-–r(ur)lur*[N→N]-[N][Abs][PlUnpd]:el+peci+u͡rlu+ut    EncliticOrEnd;


LEXICON QuantQual
allakar        QuantQualPostbase; ! separately
kesir          QuantQualPostbase; ! only; alone
keyir          QuantQualPostbase; ! only; alone
kii            QuantQualPostbase; ! only; alone
kii            VerbEte; ! only; alone
kiir           QuantQualPostbase; ! only; alone
tamar          QuantQualPostbase; ! all; whole; entire; every
tamalkur       QuantQualPostbase; ! all; whole; entire; every


LEXICON QuantQualPostbase
QuantQualInflection;
-–rrar*[N→N]:–r̲r̲ar*      QuantQualPostbase; ! just a little N; a little bit of N; a few N; and -rrar-to V a little; to just barely V


LEXICON QuantQualInflection
!---------------------------------|
!  Quantifier-Qualifier Endings   |
!----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
                                                                                                -[Quant_Qual][P_3Sg]:%:(ng)an      EncliticOrEnd;
                                                                                                -[Quant_Qual][P_3Pl]:%:(ng)ita     EncliticOrEnd;
                                                                                                -[Quant_Qual][P_3Du]:+(g)kenka     EncliticOrEnd;
!----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
-[Quant_Qual][S_1Sg]:+ma           EncliticOrEnd; -[Quant_Qual][A_1Sg]:+ma           EncliticOrEnd; -[Quant_Qual][P_1Sg]:+ma           EncliticOrEnd;
-[Quant_Qual][S_1Pl]:–mta          EncliticOrEnd; -[Quant_Qual][A_1Pl]:–mta          EncliticOrEnd; -[Quant_Qual][P_1Pl]:–mta          EncliticOrEnd;
-[Quant_Qual][S_1Du]:–megnuk       EncliticOrEnd; -[Quant_Qual][A_1Du]:–megnuk       EncliticOrEnd; -[Quant_Qual][P_1Du]:–megnuk       EncliticOrEnd;
!----------------------------------------------|!----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
-[Quant_Qual][S_2Sg]:+p|.vet       EncliticOrEnd; -[Quant_Qual][A_2Sg]:+p|.vet       EncliticOrEnd; -[Quant_Qual][P_2Sg]:+p|.vet       EncliticOrEnd;
-[Quant_Qual][S_2Pl]:+p|.vci       EncliticOrEnd; -[Quant_Qual][A_2Pl]:+p|.vci       EncliticOrEnd; -[Quant_Qual][P_2Pl]:+p|.vci       EncliticOrEnd;
-[Quant_Qual][S_2Du]:+p|.vtek      EncliticOrEnd; -[Quant_Qual][A_2Du]:+p|.vtek      EncliticOrEnd; -[Quant_Qual][P_2Du]:+p|.vtek      EncliticOrEnd;
!----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
-[Quant_Qual][S_4Sg]:+mi           EncliticOrEnd; -[Quant_Qual][A_4Sg]:+mi           EncliticOrEnd;
-[Quant_Qual][S_4Pl]:+meng         EncliticOrEnd; -[Quant_Qual][A_4Pl]:+meng         EncliticOrEnd;
-[Quant_Qual][S_4Du]:+mek          EncliticOrEnd; -[Quant_Qual][A_4Du]:+mek          EncliticOrEnd;
!----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|


LEXICON DemAbsSg
[DemPro]-[Abs][SgUnpd]:+na                       EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-–r(ur)lur*[N→N]-[Abs][SgUnpd]:+nau͡rluq  EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-[Abs][SgUnpd]-–lkug[N→N]:+na–lkug       EncliticOrEnd; ! no-good, darned N
[DemPro]-–kucir[N→N]:–kucir                       NounPostbase; ! one of the same kind as N
[DemPro]-[Voc][SgUnpd]:@+suuq             EncliticOrEnd; ! singular vocative (calling) form
[DemPro]-[Voc][SgUnpd]:@+yuuq             EncliticOrEnd; ! (Y and HBC form) singular vocative (calling) form

LEXICON DemAbsSgIrr
n[DemPro]-[Abs][SgUnpd]:+n'a                       EncliticOrEnd;
n[DemPro]-–r(ur)lur*[N→N]-[Abs][SgUnpd]:+n'au͡rluq  EncliticOrEnd;
n[DemPro]-–kucir[N→N]:–kucir                        NounPostbase;  ! one of the same kind as N
n[DemPro]-[Voc][SgUnpd]:@+cuuq              EncliticOrEnd; ! (Y and HBC form) singular vocative (calling) form
n[DemPro]-[Voc][SgUnpd]:@+cuuq              EncliticOrEnd; ! singular vocative (calling) form

LEXICON DemNonAbsSg
[DemPro]-[Rel][SgUnpd]:.m              EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-[Abl_Mod][SgUnpd]:.mek        EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-[Loc][SgUnpd]:.mi             EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-[Ter][SgUnpd]:.mun            EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-[Via][SgUnpd]:.kun            EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-[Equ][SgUnpd]:.tun            EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-%:~(ng)u[N→V]:%:~(ng)u         VerbPostbase;

LEXICON DemIntermedNonSg 
[DemPro]-[Abs][PlUnpd]:.t              EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-[Abs][DuUnpd]:.k              EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-[Rel][PlUnpd]:.t              EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-[Rel][DuUnpd]:.k              EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-[Abl_Mod][PlUnpd]:.nek        EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-[Abl_Mod][DuUnpd]:.gnek       EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-[Loc][PlUnpd]:.ni             EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-[Loc][DuUnpd]:.gni            EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-[Ter][PlUnpd]:.nun            EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-[Ter][DuUnpd]:.gnun           EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-[Via][PlUnpd]:.tgun           EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-[Via][DuUnpd]:.negnun         EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-[Equ][PlUnpd]:.cetun          EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-[Equ][DuUnpd]:.gcetun         EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-[Voc][PlUnpd]:.ut             EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-[Voc][DuUnpd]:.uk             EncliticOrEnd;
[DemPro]-~+miu[N→N]:~+miu               NounPostbase; ! inhabitant of N; resident of N; tribe-member of or from N
[DemPro]-%:~(ng)u[N→V]:%:~(ng)u         VerbPostbase;

LEXICON DemAdv2Ter
DemAdv;
[DemAdv]-–qlikacaar(ar*)[N→N]:–q̲likacaar(ar*)  NounPostbase; ! one that is the farthest in the area denoted by N
[DemAdv]-–qlir*[N→N]:–q̲lir*             NounPostbase; ! the one located far in the area or space or time denoted by N
[DemAdv]-–qsig[N→V]:–q̲sig               VerbPostbase; ! to be far in the direction denoted by N
[DemAdv]-–qsigi[N→V]:–q̲sigi             VerbPostbase; ! to get farther into the area denoted by N
[DemAdv]-–qva[N→N]:–q̲va                 NounPostbase; ! area far in the direction of N
[DemAdv]-–qvaar*[N→N]:–q̲vaar*           NounPostbase; ! area far in the direction of N
[DemAdv]-[Sec_Ter]:.tmun                EncliticOrEnd;
[DemAdv]-[Sec_Ter]–tmurte1[N→V]:.tmurte VerbPostbase; ! to go N-ward; to go in the area described by V

LEXICON Exceptions
aqum-@–ngqa[V→V]:aqum+gar                                 QuantQualInflection; ! sitting
LEXICON Demonstrative
au͡g                DemAbsSg; ing                DemAbsSg; am                  DemAbsSg;
au͡g:au͡g+'u      DemNonAbsSg; ing:ing+'u      DemNonAbsSg; am:am+'u         DemNonAbsSg;
au͡g:au͡g+ku DemIntermedNonSg; ing:ing+ku DemIntermedNonSg; am:am+ku    DemIntermedNonSg;
au͡g:aw+ku  DemIntermedNonSg;                                                                
ag                 DemAbsSg; ik                 DemAbsSg; akem                DemAbsSg;
                             ikegg              DemAbsSg;                             
ag:ag+'u        DemNonAbsSg; ik:ik+'u        DemNonAbsSg; akem:ak'm+u      DemNonAbsSg;
                             ikegg:ikg+u     DemNonAbsSg;                             
ag:ag+ku   DemIntermedNonSg; ik:ikeg+ku DemIntermedNonSg; akem:akem+ku DemIntermedNonSg;
                             ikegg:ikeg+ku DemIntermedNonSg;
ii               DemAdv2Ter;                                                         
pau͡g                 DemAbsSg; ping                 DemAbsSg; pam                 DemAbsSg;
pau͡g:pau͡g+'u      DemNonAbsSg; ping:ping+'u      DemNonAbsSg; pam:pam+'u       DemNonAbsSg;
pau͡g:pau͡g+ku DemIntermedNonSg; ping:ping+ku DemIntermedNonSg; pam:pam+ku  DemIntermedNonSg;
pag                DemAbsSg; pik                  DemAbsSg; pakem                  DemAbsSg;
                             pikegg               DemAbsSg;
pag:pag+'u      DemNonAbsSg; pik:pik+'u        DemNonAbsSg; pakem:pak'm+u       DemNonAbsSg;
                             pikegg:pikg+u     DemNonAbsSg;
pag:pag+ku DemIntermedNonSg; pik:pikeg+ku DemIntermedNonSg; pakem:pakem+ku DemIntermedNonSg;
                             pikegg:pikeg+ku DemIntermedNonSg;
pii              DemAdv2Ter;
qau͡g                 DemAbsSg; kiug                 DemAbsSg; qam                DemAbsSg;
                               kiu͡g                 DemAbsSg;
qau͡g:qau͡g+'u      DemNonAbsSg; kiug:kiug+u       DemNonAbsSg; qam:qam+'u      DemNonAbsSg;
                               kiu͡g:kiu͡g+'u      DemNonAbsSg;
qau͡g:qau͡g+ku DemIntermedNonSg; kiug:kiug+ku DemIntermedNonSg; qam:qam+ku DemIntermedNonSg;
                               kiu͡g:kiu͡g+ku DemIntermedNonSg;
qag                DemAbsSg; kegg                DemAbsSg; qakem               DemAbsSg;
qag:qag+'u      DemNonAbsSg; kegg:kegg+'u     DemNonAbsSg; qakem:qak'm+u     DemNonAbsSg;
qag:qag+ku DemIntermedNonSg; kegg:keg+ku DemIntermedNonSg; qakem:qakem+ku DemIntermedNonSg;
qii              DemAdv2Ter;
                             ka              DemAbsSgIrr; cam                 DemAbsSg;
un:un+'u        DemNonAbsSg; kan:kat+'u      DemNonAbsSg; cam:cam+'u       DemNonAbsSg;
un:un+ku   DemIntermedNonSg; kan:kan+ku DemIntermedNonSg; cam:cam+ku  DemIntermedNonSg;
uneg                 DemAbsSg; ug                 DemAbsSg; cakem                  DemAbsSg;
uneg:ung+'u       DemNonAbsSg; ug:ug+'u        DemNonAbsSg; cakem:cak'm+u       DemNonAbsSg;
uneg:uneg+ku DemIntermedNonSg; ug:ug+ku   DemIntermedNonSg; cakem:cakem+ku DemIntermedNonSg;
un'gaa             DemAdv2Ter;
ma              DemAbsSgIrr; u                  DemAbsSg; im                  DemAbsSg;
man:mat+'u      DemNonAbsSg; u:u+u           DemNonAbsSg; im:im'u             DemNonAbsSg;
                                                          im:imu              DemNonAbsSg;
man:ma+ku  DemIntermedNonSg; u:u+ku     DemIntermedNonSg; im:imku        DemIntermedNonSg;
tama                 DemAbsSg; tau                DemAbsSg; 
tama:tama+tu      DemNonAbsSg; tau             DemNonAbsSg; 
tama:tama+ku DemIntermedNonSg; tau:tau+ku DemIntermedNonSg; 
uk                    DemAbsSg;
ukegg                 DemAbsSg; 
uk:uk+'u           DemNonAbsSg;
ukegg:ukg+u        DemNonAbsSg;
uk:ukeg+ku    DemIntermedNonSg; 
ukegg:ukeg+ku DemIntermedNonSg; 
uka                 DemAdv2Ter;  
